Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
708A]

MONEY
LAUNDERING

Section

708A-1 Title

708A-2 Definitions

708A-3 Money laundering; criminal penalty

COMMENTARY ON CHAPTER 708A

Act 119, Session Laws 1995, repealed part XI, chapter 708
(money laundering), and created this chapter to provide a comprehensive
strategy to combat the economic effects of money laundering as the legislature
found that money laundering is an integral component of criminal networks.

This chapter conforms to the federal money laundering
statute, and in particular, prohibits knowingly conducting or attempting to
conduct a financial transaction involving property represented to be proceeds
of specified unlawful activity, with the intent to further the unlawful
activity or knowing the action is designed to conceal or disguise the nature,
location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds.

The prohibited acts and penalties of this chapter are
applicable to any person committing the specified unlawful acts if the person
believes the value or aggregate value of the property transported, transmitted,
transferred, received, or acquired is $10,000 or more or if the value or
aggregate value is, in fact, $10,000 or more. Conference Committee Report No.
131.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next